Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.396

Ignition interlock devices—Fee schedule and fee collection—Report—Fee deposit.

(1) As part of the state patrol's authority to provide standards for certification, installation, repair, maintenance, monitoring, inspection, and removal of ignition interlock devices, the state patrol shall by rule establish a fee schedule and collect fees from ignition interlock manufacturers, technicians, providers, and persons required under RCW 46.20.385, 46.20.720, and 46.61.5055 to install an ignition interlock device in all vehicles owned or operated by the person. At a minimum, the fees must be set at a level necessary to support effective performance of the duties identified in this section. The state patrol must report back to the transportation committees of the legislature and the office of financial management by December 1st of each year on the level of the fees that have been adopted and whether those fees are sufficient to cover the cost of performing the duties listed in this section.

(2) Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the highway safety account [fund] to be used solely to fund the Washington state patrol impaired driving section projects.

[ 2012 c 183 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 183: See note following RCW 9.94A.475.